Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Chapter 11 Common Carriers by Air

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

8A Am. Jur. 2d Aviation §§ 59 to 82.

Res ipsa loquitur in aviation accidents, 6 ALR2d 528.

Open door as ground of liability for injury to passenger falling or alighting from airplane, 7 ALR2d 1427.

Air carrier, limitation of liability for personal injury, 13 ALR2d 337.

Carrier's certificate of convenience and necessity, franchise or permit as subject to transfer or encumbrance, 15 ALR2d 883.

Liability of air carrier for loss of or damage to passengers' baggage or contents thereof, 25 ALR2d 1352.

Duty and liability to guest or passenger as to preflight inspection and maintenance of aircraft, 30 ALR2d 1172.

Liability of carrier by land or air for damage to goods shipped resulting from improper loading, 44 ALR2d 993.

Duty of aeroplane owner or operator to furnish aircraft with navigational and flight safety devices, 50 ALR2d 898.

Carrier's liability to passenger injured while using washroom or lavatory facilities on conveyance, 50 ALR2d 1071.

Liability of air carrier to passenger injured while boarding or alighting, 61 ALR2d 1113.

Air carrier as common or private carrier, and resulting duties as to passenger's safety, 73 ALR2d 346.

Liability of carrier by air for injury or death of passenger due to downdraft, updraft, or turbulence, 73 ALR2d 379.

Air pressure, air carrier's liability for injury to passenger from changes in, 75 ALR2d 848.

Overloading aircraft, liability for personal injury or death based on, 75 ALR2d 868.

Liability of manufacturer or seller for injury caused by automobile or other vehicle, aircraft, boat, or their parts, supplies, or equipment, 78 ALR2d 460.

Guest statute, airplane as “motor vehicle” within, 98 ALR2d 543.

Liability of air carrier to one injured or killed by slip or fall at airport, 3 ALR3d 938.

Construction and validity of “venue” or “jurisdiction” provision of article 28(1) of Warsaw Convention (49 Stat. § 3000 et seq.) relating to international transportation by air, 6 ALR3d 1272.

Rights and liabilities under airplane passengers' trip insurance policy, 29 ALR3d 766.

Liability for injury to guest in airplane, 40 ALR3d 1117.

Liability of air carrier for injury to or death of, passenger on charter flight, 41 ALR3d 455.

Liability for alleged negligence of independent servicer or repairer of aircraft, 41 ALR3d 1320.

Who is “fare-paying passenger” within coverage provision of life or accident insurance policy, 60 ALR3d 1273.

Choice-of-law considerations in application of aviation guest statutes, 62 ALR3d 1076.

Applicability of aviation exclusion clause as affected by fact that injury or death occurred after termination of flight, 62 ALR3d 1243.

Constitutionality of automobile and aviation guest statutes, 66 ALR3d 532.

Liability of air carrier for damage or injury sustained by passenger as result of hijacking, 72 ALR3d 1299.

Carrier's liability based on serving intoxicants to passenger, 76 ALR3d 1218.

Air carrier's liability for injury from condition of airport premises, 14 ALR5th 662.

Death or injury to occupant of airplane from collision or near-collision with another aircraft, 64 ALR5th 235.

Construction and application of § 902(i-l) of Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended (49 U.S.C. § 1472(i-l)), punishing aircraft piracy, interference with flight crew members, and certain other crimes aboard aircraft in flight, 10 ALR Fed 844.

Validity, under federal constitution, of preflight procedures used at airports to prevent hijacking of aircraft, 14 ALR Fed 286.

Regulation of air travel clubs, charter flights, and the like, by the Civil Aeronautics Board, 27 ALR Fed 154.

Propriety, under Rule 23 of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, of class action for injuries and deaths in airplane crash, 28 ALR Fed 719.

Liability of airline for injury or death of passenger resulting from violation of duty imposed by Federal Aviation Act of 1958 (49 U.S.C. § 1301 et seq.) and implementing regulations, 31 ALR Fed 270.

Propriety of refusal of airline to transport passenger or property under § 1111(a) of Federal Aviation Act of 1958 (49 USC Appx § 1511(a)), 75 ALR Fed 212.

Limitation on liability of international air carrier for loss of or damage to baggage or goods under Article 22 of the Warsaw Convention, 75 ALR Fed 525.

Limitation of liability of air carrier for personal injury or death, 91 ALR Fed 547.

Construction and application of § 105 Airline Deregulation Act (49 U.S.C. § 41713), pertaining to preemption of authority over prices, routes, and services, 149 ALR Fed 299.

2A C.J.S. Aeronautics and Aerospace §§ 168 to 269.

§ 37-11-101.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

37-11-101

through

37-11-103

, unless the context otherwise requires, the term “person” means any individual, firm, co-partnership, corporation, company, association, joint-stock association or body politic, and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee or other similar representative thereof.

“Common carriers by air” as used in this act [§§

37-11-101

through

37-11-103

] means any person or persons engaged in regularly scheduled air transportation of persons or property for compensation or hire within the state of Wyoming concerning those activities where the United States has not excluded the states from regulating.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 19, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 37-236; Laws 1961, ch. 27, § 1; 1975, ch. 201, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions that all corporations engaged in the transportation of persons, etc., are declared to be common carriers, see art. 10, § 7, Wyo. Const.

As to aeronautics generally, see title 10.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “W.S.

37-11-101

through

37-11-103

” for “W.S. 37-236 through 37-238” in (a).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§ 37-11-102.
Conditions precedent to issuance of certificate.

No certificate of public convenience and necessity shall be issued by the department of transportation to any person authorizing operation, as a common carrier by aircraft in Wyoming intrastate commerce, unless and until the applicant shall have submitted to the department a certificate, signed by the director of the Wyoming aeronautics commission, to the effect that the applicant has complied with the laws of the United States, the laws of the state of Wyoming, and the lawful rules, regulations and orders, respecting safety of operations; and the provisions of the “Uniform State Law for Aeronautics”, with respect to the right to use airports, airlanes and aircraft as necessary in order to properly conduct the proposed operations and observe proper standards of safety in the operation or navigation of aircraft. The Wyoming aeronautics commission shall require all applicants for a certificate of public convenience and necessity to furnish to it such evidence as it may require showing that they have complied in all respects with the laws, rules, regulations and orders.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 19, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 37-237; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to the Wyoming aeronautics commission, see §§

10-3-101

to

10-3-403

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Certificate of convenience and necessity, franchise, or permit as subject to transfer or encumbrance, 15 ALR2d 883.

Construction and application of Federal Aviation Act provision (49 U.S.C. § 1487 (a)) for judicial enforcement by “any party in interest” of provision (49 U.S.C. § 1371 (a)) prohibiting noncertificated carriers from engaging in air transportation, 19 ALR Fed 951.

§ 37-11-103.
Hearings; right of aeronautics commission or director to intervene.

Whenever a hearing is scheduled before the department of transportation in any proceeding for authority to conduct common aircraft operations in Wyoming intrastate commerce, it shall be the duty of the director of the department to notify the administrator of the Wyoming aeronautics commission; and the Wyoming aeronautics commission or its administrator may intervene in the proceedings for the purpose of setting up the interests of the Wyoming aeronautics commission.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 19, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 37-238; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to hearings generally, see §§

37-2-201

to

37-2-221

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).